zh-CN: 天文馆内容主题: 星座; 深空（星云/星系）; 地球与大气层（极光）; 混合/什锦; 月相; 夜空（星星）; 行星; 太阳系; 其他
pt-PT: Planetário Conteúdo tema: Constelações; Espaço profundo (nebulosas/galáxias); Terra e atmosfera (aurora); Misto/variado; Fases da lua; Céu noturno (estrelas); Planetas; Sistema Solar; Outro
fi: Planetaarion sisältöteema: Tähdistöt; Syvä avaruus (sumut/galaksit); Maa ja ilmakehä (revontulet); Sekoitus/lajitelma; Kuun vaiheet; Yötaivas (tähdet); Planeetat; Aurinkokunta; Muu
pt-BR: Planetário conteúdo tema: Constelações; Espaço sideral (nebulosas/galáxias); Terra e atmosfera (aurora); Misto/sortido; Fases da lua; Céu noturno (estrelas); Planetas; Sistema solar; Outro
lt-LT: Planetariumo turinio tema: Žvaigždynai; Tolusis kosmosas (ūkai / galaktikos); Žemė ir atmosfera (šiaurės pašvaistė); Mišrus / įvairus; Mėnulio fazės; Naktinis dangus (žvaigždės); Planetos; Saulės sistema; Kita
hu: Planetáriumtartalom témája: Csillagképek; Mélyűr (ködfelhők/galaxisok); Föld és légkör (sarki fény); Vegyes; Holdfázisok; Éjszakai égbolt (csillagok); Bolygók; Naprendszer; Egyéb
da: PlanetarieIndholdstema: Stjernebilleder; Ydre rum (stjernetåger/galakser); Jorden og atmosfæren (nordlys); Blandet/assorteret; Månefaser; Nattehimmel (stjerner); Planeter; Solsystem; Andet
en: Planetarium content theme: Constellations; Deep space (nebula/galaxies); Earth & atmosphere (aurora); Mixed/assorted; Moon phases; Night sky (stars); Planets; Solar system; Other
sv: Temainnehåll för planetarium: Stjärnbilder; Djup rymd (nebulosor/galaxer); Jorden och atmosfären (norrsken); Blandat/sorterat; Månfaser; Natthimlen (stjärnor); Planeter; Solsystemet; Övrigt
el: Θεματολογία περιεχομένου πλανητάριου: Αστερισμοί; Βαθύ διάστημα (νεφελώματα/γαλαξίες); Γη και ατμόσφαιρα (σέλας); Ανάμεικτα/διάφορα; Φάσεις της σελήνης; Νυχτερινός ουρανός (αστέρια); Πλανήτες; Ηλιακό σύστημα; Άλλο
de: Inhaltsthema des Planetariums: Sternbilder; Deep Space (Nebel/Galaxien); Erde & Atmosphäre (Polarlichter); Gemischt/Sortiert; Mondphasen; Nachthimmel (Sterne); Planeten; Sonnensystem; Sonstige
cs: Téma obsahu planetária: Souhvězdí; Hluboký vesmír (mlhoviny/galaxie); Země a atmosféra (polární záře); Smíšené/různé; Fáze Měsíce; Noční obloha (hvězdy); Planety; Sluneční soustava; Jiné
pl: Temat treści planetarium: Konstelacje; Głęboki kosmos (mgławice/galaktyki); Ziemia i atmosfera (zorza polarna); Mieszane; Fazy księżyca; Nocne niebo (gwiazdy); Planety; Układ Słoneczny; Inne
ru: Тематика планетария: Созвездия; Дальний космос (туманности/галактики); Земля и атмосфера (полярное сияние); Смешанная/ассорти; Фазы Луны; Ночное небо (звезды); Планеты; Солнечная система; Другое
sk-SK: Téma obsahu planetária: Súhvezdia; Hlboký vesmír (hmloviny/galaxie); Zem a atmosféra (polárna žiara); Zmiešané/rôzne; Fázy mesiaca; Nočná obloha (hviezdy); Planéty; Slnečná sústava; Iné
zh-TW: 星空投影機內容主題: 星座; 深空 (星雲/星系); 地球與大氣 (極光); 混合/什錦; 月相; 夜空 (星星); 行星; 太陽系; 其他
es: Tema de contenido del proyector de planetario: Constelaciones; Espacio profundo (nebulosas/galaxias); Tierra y atmósfera (aurora); Mixto/variado; Fases de la luna; Cielo nocturno (estrellas); Planetas; Sistema solar; Otro
fr: Thème du contenu de planétarium: Constellations; Espace lointain (nébuleuses/galaxies); Terre et atmosphère (aurores boréales); Mixte/assorti; Phases de la lune; Ciel nocturne (étoiles); Planètes; Système solaire; Autre
sl-SI: Vsebinska tematika planetarija: Ozvezdja; Globoko vesolje (meglice/galaksije); Zemlja in atmosfera (polarni sij); Mešano/raznovrstno; Lunine mene; Nočno nebo (zvezde); Planeti; Osončje; Drugo
ko: 플라네타륨 콘텐츠 테마: 별자리; 심우주(성운/은하); 지구 및 대기(오로라); 혼합/모둠; 달의 위상; 밤하늘(별); 행성; 태양계; 기타
ro-RO: Temă de conținut a planetariului: Constelații; Spațiul cosmic profund (nebuloase/galaxii); Pământ și atmosferă (aurore); Mixt/asortat; Fazele lunii; Cerul nopții (stele); Planete; Sistemul solar; Altele
ja: プラネタリウムコンテンツテーマ: 星座; 深宇宙 (星雲/銀河); 地球と大気 (オーロラ); ミックス/アソート; 月の満ち欠け; 夜空 (星); 惑星; 太陽系; その他
vi: Chủ đề nội dung cung thiên văn: Chòm sao; Không gian sâu (tinh vân/thiên hà); Trái Đất và bầu khí quyển (cực quang); Hỗn hợp/đa dạng; Các pha mặt trăng; Bầu trời đêm (các vì sao); Các hành tinh; Hệ mặt trời; Khác
it: Tema dei contenuti del planetario: Costellazioni; Spazio profondo (nebulose/galassie); Terra e atmosfera (aurora); Misto/assortito; Fasi lunari; Cielo notturno (stelle); Pianeti; Sistema solare; Altro
hr-HR: Planetarij Sadržaj teme: Zviježđa; Duboki svemir (maglice/galaksije); Zemlja i atmosfera (polarna svjetlost); Miješano/raznoliko; Mjesečeve mijene; Noćno nebo (zvijezde); Planeti; Sunčev sustav; Ostalo
th: ธีมเนื้อหาของท้องฟ้าจำลอง: กลุ่มดาว; ห้วงอวกาศลึก (เนบิวลา/กาแล็กซี); โลกและชั้นบรรยากาศ (ออโรร่า); คละแบบ/ผสม; ข้างขึ้นข้างแรม; ท้องฟ้ายามค่ำคืน (ดวงดาว); ดาวเคราะห์; ระบบสุริยะ; อื่นๆ
nl: Planetarium content thema: Sterrenbeelden; Diepe ruimte (nevel/sterrenstelsels); Aarde en atmosfeer (noorderlicht); Gemengd/gevarieerd; Maanfasen; Nachtelijke hemel (sterren); Planeten; Zonnestelsel; Overig
nb: Planetarium – innholdstema: Stjernebilder; Dypt verdensrom (tåker/galakser); Jorden og atmosfæren (nordlys); Blandet/assortert; Månefaser; Nattehimmel (stjerner); Planeter; Solsystemet; Annet
tr: Planetaryum içerik teması: Takımyıldızlar; Derin uzay (bulutsu/galaksiler); Dünya ve atmosfer (aurora); Karışık/çeşitli; Ay evreleri; Gece gökyüzü (yıldızlar); Gezegenler; Güneş sistemi; Diğer
bg-BG: Тема на съдържанието за планетариум: Съзвездия; Дълбок космос (мъглявини/галактики); Земя и атмосфера (северно сияние); Смесени/разнообразни; Фази на луната; Нощно небе (звезди); Планети; Слънчева система; Друго